North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 6. Communicable Diseases.

Part 1. In General.

§ 130A-133.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-179, s. 3, effective October 1, 2002.

§ 130A-134.
Reportable diseases and conditions.

The Commission shall establish by rule a list of communicable diseases and communicable conditions to be reported.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 4.

§ 130A-135.
Physicians to report.

A physician licensed to practice medicine who has reason to suspect that a person about whom the physician has been consulted professionally has a communicable disease or communicable condition declared by the Commission to be reported, shall report information
required by the Commission to the local health director of the county or district in which the physician is consulted. The Commission shall declare confirmed HIV infection to be a reportable communicable condition.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 11; Rev., s. 3448; 1917, c. 263, s. 7; C.S., s. 7151; 1921, c. 223, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 5; 1989, c. 698, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Physicians’ Elusive Public Health Duties,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 923 (2021).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Public Law 93-380 was inapplicable to reporting under former G.S. 130-81
by a college or university physician. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Rodney Hobbs, Division of Health Services, N.C. Department of Human Resources, 44 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 163 (1974).

§ 130A-136.
School principals and child care operators to report.

A principal of a school and an operator of a child care facility, as defined in

G.S. 110-86(3)

, who has reason to suspect that a person within the school or child care facility has a communicable disease or communicable condition declared by the Commission to be reported, shall report information required by the
Commission to the local health director of the county or district in which the school or facility is located.

History.
1979, c. 192, s. 2; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 6; 1997-506, s. 46.

§ 130A-137.
Medical facilities may report.

A medical facility, in which there is a patient reasonably suspected of having a communicable disease or condition declared by the Commission to be reported, may report information specified by the Commission to the local health director of the county
or district in which the facility is located.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 7.

§ 130A-138.
Operators of restaurants and other food or drink establishments to report.

An operator of a restaurant or other establishment where food or drink is prepared or served for pay, as defined in G.S. 130A-247(4) and (5), shall report information required by the Commission to the local health director of the county or district in
which the restaurant or food establishment is located when the operator has reason to suspect an outbreak of food-borne illness in its customers or employees or when it has reason to suspect that a food handler at the establishment
has a food-borne disease or food-borne condition required by the Commission to be reported.

History.
1917, c. 263, s. 9; C.S., s. 7153; 1921, c. 223, s. 3; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1979, c. 192, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 8.

§ 130A-139.
Persons in charge of laboratories to report.

A person in charge of a laboratory providing diagnostic service in this State shall report information required by the Commission to a public health agency specified by the Commission when the laboratory makes any of the following findings:

Sputa, gastric contents, or other specimens which are smear positive for acid fast bacilli or culture positive for Mycobacterium tuberculosis;

Urethral smears positive for Gram-negative intracellular diplococci or any culture positive for Neisseria gonorrhoeae;

Positive serological tests for syphilis or positive darkfield examination; [or]

Any other positive test indicative of a communicable disease or communicable condition for which laboratory reporting is required by the Commission.

History.
1981, c. 81, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 9; 2001-28, s. 1.

§ 130A-140.
Local health directors to report.

A local health director shall report to the Department all cases of diseases or conditions or laboratory findings of residents of the jurisdiction of the local health department which are reported to the local health director pursuant to this Article.
A local health director shall report all other cases and laboratory findings reported pursuant to this Article to the local health director of the county, district, or authority where the person with the reportable disease or condition
or laboratory finding resides.

History.
1919, c. 206, s. 2; C.S., s. 7192; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1961, c. 753; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 10; 1997-502, s. 10.

§ 130A-141.
Form, content and timing of reports.

The Commission shall adopt rules which establish the specific information to be submitted when making a report required by this Article, time limits for reporting, the form of the reports and to whom reports of laboratory findings are to be made.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 11.

§ 130A-141.1.
Temporary order to report.

The State Health Director may issue a temporary order requiring health care providers to report symptoms, diseases, conditions, trends in use of health care services, or other health-related information when necessary to conduct a public health investigation
or surveillance of an illness, condition, or symptoms that may indicate the existence of a communicable disease or condition that presents a danger to the public health. The order shall specify which health care providers must
report, what information is to be reported, and the period of time for which reporting is required. The period of time for which reporting is required pursuant to a temporary order shall not exceed 90 days. The Commission may adopt
rules to continue the reporting requirement when necessary to protect the public health.

For the purposes of this section, the term “health care provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in G.S. 130A-476(g).

History.
2004-80, s. 5.

§ 130A-142.
Immunity of persons who report.

A person who makes a report pursuant to the provisions of this Article shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making that report.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 12.

§ 130A-143.
Confidentiality of records.

All information and records, whether publicly or privately maintained, that identify a person who has or may have a disease or condition required to be reported pursuant to the provisions of this Article shall be strictly confidential. This information
shall not be released or made public except under the following circumstances:

Release is made of specific medical or epidemiological information for statistical purposes in a way that no person can be identified.

Release is made of all or part of the medical record with the written consent of the person or persons identified or the person’s personal representative, as defined in 45 Code of Federal Regulations § 164.502.

Release is made for purposes of treatment, payment, research, or health care operations to the extent that disclosure is permitted under 45 Code of Federal Regulations §§ 164.506 and 164.512(i). For purposes of this section, the terms “treatment,” “payment,”
“research,” and “health care operations” have the meaning given those terms in 45 Code of Federal Regulations § 164.501.

Release is necessary to protect the public health and is made as provided by the Commission in its rules regarding control measures for communicable diseases and conditions.

Release is made pursuant to other provisions of this Article.

Release is made pursuant to court order or a subpoena issued by a judicial official. Upon request of the person identified in the record, the record shall be reviewed in camera. In the trial, the trial judge may, during the taking of testimony concerning
such information, exclude from the courtroom all persons except the officers of the court, the parties and those engaged in the trial of the case.

Release is made by the Department or a local health department to a court or a judicial official for the purpose of enforcing this Article or Article 22 of this Chapter.

(7a)
Release is made by the Department or a local health department to a law enforcement official for any of the following purposes: (i) to prevent or lessen a serious or imminent threat to the health or safety of a
person or the public, to the extent that disclosure is permitted under 45 Code of Federal Regulations § 164.512(j) and not otherwise permitted by subdivision (4) of this section, (ii) to enforce this Article or Article 22 of
this Chapter, or (iii) to investigate a terrorist incident using nuclear, biological, or chemical agents. A law enforcement official who receives the information shall not disclose it further, except (i) when necessary to enforce
this Article or Article 22 of this Chapter; or when necessary to conduct an investigation of a terrorist incident using nuclear, biological, or chemical agents; or (ii) when the Department or a local health department seeks
the assistance of the law enforcement official in preventing or controlling the spread of the disease or condition and expressly authorizes the disclosure as necessary for that purpose.

Release is made by the Department or a local health department to another federal, State, tribal, or local public health agency for the purpose of preventing or controlling the spread of a communicable disease or communicable condition.

Release is made by the Department for bona fide research purposes. The Commission shall adopt rules providing for the use of the information for research purposes.

Release is made pursuant to

G.S. 130A-144(b)

.

Release is made pursuant to any other provisions of law that specifically authorize or require the release of information or records related to AIDS.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 13; 2002-179, s. 7; 2011-314, s. 4; 2020-3, s. 4.17(a).

§ 130A-144.
Investigation and control measures.

The local health director shall investigate, as required by the Commission, cases of communicable diseases and communicable conditions reported to the local health director pursuant to this Article.

Physicians, persons in charge of medical facilities or laboratories, and other persons shall, upon request and proper identification, permit a local health director or the State Health Director to examine, review, and obtain a copy of medical or other
records in their possession or under their control which the State Health Director or a local health director determines pertain to the (i) diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of a communicable disease or communicable condition
for a person infected, exposed, or reasonably suspected of being infected or exposed to such a disease or condition, or (ii) the investigation of a known or reasonably suspected outbreak of a communicable disease or communicable
condition.

A physician or a person in charge of a medical facility or laboratory who permits examination, review or copying of medical records pursuant to subsection (b) shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed
as a result of complying with a request made pursuant to subsection (b).

The attending physician shall give control measures prescribed by the Commission to a patient with a communicable disease or communicable condition and to patients reasonably suspected of being infected or exposed to such a disease or condition. The physician
shall also give control measures to other individuals as required by rules adopted by the Commission.

The local health director shall ensure that control measures prescribed by the Commission have been given to prevent the spread of all reportable communicable diseases or communicable conditions and any other communicable disease or communicable condition
that represents a significant threat to the public health. The local health department shall provide, at no cost to the patient, the examination and treatment for tuberculosis disease and infection and for sexually transmitted
diseases designated by the Commission.

All persons shall comply with control measures, including submission to examinations and tests, prescribed by the Commission subject to the limitations of

G.S. 130A-148

.

The Commission shall adopt rules that prescribe control measures for communicable diseases and conditions subject to the limitations of

G.S. 130A-148

. Temporary rules prescribing control measures for communicable diseases and conditions shall be adopted pursuant to G.S. 150B-13.

Anyone who assists in an inquiry or investigation conducted by the State Health Director for the purpose of evaluating the risk of transmission of HIV or Hepatitis B from an infected health care worker to patients, or who serves on an expert panel established
by the State Health Director for that purpose, shall be immune from civil liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed for any acts or omissions which result from such assistance or service, provided that the person acts
in good faith and the acts or omissions do not amount to gross negligence, willful or wanton misconduct, or intentional wrongdoing. This qualified immunity does not apply to acts or omissions which occur with respect to the operation
of a motor vehicle. Nothing in this subsection provides immunity from liability for a violation of

G.S. 130A-143

.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 16; Rev., s. 4459; 1909, c. 793, s. 8; C.S., s. 7158; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 14; 1991, c. 225, s. 1; 1995, c. 228, s. 1; 2001-28, s. 2; 2004-80, s.
6; 2009-501, s. 2.

§ 130A-145.
Quarantine and isolation authority. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The State Health Director and a local health director are empowered to exercise quarantine and isolation authority. Quarantine and isolation authority shall be exercised only when and so long as the public health is endangered, all other reasonable means
for correcting the problem have been exhausted, and no less restrictive alternative exists.

No person other than a person authorized by the State Health Director or local health director shall enter quarantine or isolation premises. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict the access of authorized health care, law enforcement,
or emergency medical services personnel to quarantine or isolation premises as necessary in conducting their duties.

Before applying quarantine or isolation authority to livestock or poultry for the purpose of preventing the direct or indirect conveyance of an infectious agent to persons, the State Health Director or a local health director shall consult with the State
Veterinarian in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

When quarantine or isolation limits the freedom of movement of a person or animal or of access to a person or animal whose freedom of movement is limited, the period of limited freedom of movement or access shall not exceed 30 calendar days. Any person
substantially affected by that limitation may institute in superior court in Wake County or in the county in which the limitation is imposed an action to review that limitation. The official who exercises the quarantine or isolation
authority shall give the persons known by the official to be substantially affected by the limitation reasonable notice under the circumstances of the right to institute an action to review the limitation. If a person or a person’s
representative requests a hearing, the hearing shall be held within 72 hours of the filing of that request, excluding Saturdays and Sundays. The person substantially affected by that limitation is entitled to be represented by
counsel of the person’s own choice or if the person is indigent, the person shall be represented by counsel appointed in accordance with Article 36 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes and the rules adopted by the Office of Indigent
Defense Services. The court shall reduce or terminate the limitation unless it determines, by the preponderance of the evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to prevent or limit the conveyance of a communicable disease
or condition to others.If the State Health Director or the local health director determines that a 30-calendar-day limitation on freedom of movement or access is not adequate to protect the public health, the State Health Director
or local health director must institute in superior court in the county in which the limitation is imposed an action to obtain an order extending the period of limitation of freedom of movement or access. If the person substantially
affected by the limitation has already instituted an action in superior court in Wake County, the State Health Director must institute the action in superior court in Wake County or as a counterclaim in the pending case. Except
as provided below for persons with tuberculosis, the court shall continue the limitation for a period not to exceed 30 days if it determines, by the preponderance of the evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to
prevent or limit the conveyance of a communicable disease or condition to others. The court order shall specify the period of time the limitation is to be continued and shall provide for automatic termination of the order upon
written determination by the State Health Director or local health director that the quarantine or isolation is no longer necessary to protect the public health. In addition, where the petitioner can prove by a preponderance of
the evidence that quarantine or isolation was not or is no longer needed for protection of the public health, the person quarantined or isolated may move the trial court to reconsider its order extending quarantine or isolation
before the time for the order otherwise expires and may seek immediate or expedited termination of the order. Before the expiration of an order issued under this section, the State Health Director or local health director may move
to continue the order for additional periods not to exceed 30 days each. If the person whose freedom of movement has been limited has tuberculosis, the court shall continue the limitation for a period not to exceed one calendar
year if it determines, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to prevent or limit the conveyance of tuberculosis to others. The court order shall specify the period of time the limitation
is to be continued and shall provide for automatic termination of the order upon written determination by the State Health Director or local health director that the quarantine or isolation is no longer necessary to protect the
public health. In addition, where the petitioner can prove by a preponderance of the evidence that quarantine or isolation was not or is no longer needed for protection of the public health, the person quarantined or isolated may
move the trial court to reconsider its order extending quarantine or isolation before the time for the order otherwise expires and may seek immediate or expedited termination of the order. Before the expiration of an order limiting
the freedom of movement of a person with tuberculosis, the State Health Director or local health director may move to continue the order for additional periods not to exceed one calendar year each.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 15; 2002-179, s. 5; 2004-80, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to entitlement to counsel of indigent person in a proceeding involving limitation of freedom of movement or access pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

, see G.S. 7A-451(a)(17).

As to detention of an individual arrested for violation of an order limiting freedom of movement or access issued pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

, see G.S. 15A-401(b)(4),

G.S. 15A-534.5

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-80, s. 2, effective July 8, 2004, in subsection (d), in the first paragraph, substituted “30” for “10” in the first sentence, added the third sentence and substituted “or terminate the limitation unless” for “the limitation if” in the
last sentence; and in the second paragraph, substituted “30-calendar-day” for “10-calendar-day” in the first sentence, added “or as a counterclaim in the pending case” at the end of the second sentence, inserted the exception at the
beginning of the third sentence, and added the fourth, fifth, and seventh through tenth sentences.

Legal Periodicals.

For a note that addresses the effect of United States Supreme Court decision on sodomy laws and the manner in which society may shape its characterization of Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS), and homosexuality, see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 226 (1987).

§ 130A-145.
Quarantine and isolation authority. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The State Health Director and a local health director are empowered to exercise quarantine and isolation authority in accordance with this section. Quarantine and isolation authority shall be exercised only when and so long as the public health is endangered,
all other reasonable means for correcting the problem have been exhausted, and no less restrictive alternative exists.

No person other than a person authorized by the State Health Director or local health director shall enter quarantine or isolation premises. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict the access of authorized health care, law enforcement,
or emergency medical services personnel to quarantine or isolation premises as necessary in conducting their duties.

Before applying quarantine or isolation authority to livestock or poultry for the purpose of preventing the direct or indirect conveyance of an infectious agent to persons, the State Health Director or a local health director shall consult with the State
Veterinarian in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

When quarantine or isolation limits the freedom of movement of a person or animal or of access to a person or animal whose freedom of movement is limited, the period of limited freedom of movement or access shall not exceed 30 calendar days. Any person
substantially affected by that limitation may institute in superior court in Wake County or in the county in which the limitation is imposed an action to review that limitation. The official who exercises the quarantine or isolation
authority shall give the persons known by the official to be substantially affected by the limitation reasonable notice under the circumstances of the right to institute an action to review the limitation. If a person or a person’s
representative requests a hearing, the hearing shall be held within 72 hours of the filing of that request, excluding Saturdays and Sundays. The person substantially affected by that limitation is entitled to be represented by
counsel of the person’s own choice or if the person is indigent, the person shall be represented by counsel appointed in accordance with Article 36 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes and the rules adopted by the Office of Indigent
Defense Services. The court shall reduce or terminate the limitation unless it determines, by the preponderance of the evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to prevent or limit the conveyance of a communicable disease
or condition to others.

If the State Health Director or the local health director determines that a 30-calendar-day limitation on freedom of movement or access is not adequate to protect the public health, the State Health Director or local health director must institute in
superior court in the county in which the limitation is imposed an action to obtain an order extending the period of limitation of freedom of movement or access. If the person substantially affected by the limitation has already
instituted an action in superior court in Wake County, the State Health Director must institute the action in superior court in Wake County or as a counterclaim in the pending case. Except as provided below for persons with tuberculosis,
the court shall continue the limitation for a period not to exceed 30 days if it determines, by the preponderance of the evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to prevent or limit the conveyance of a communicable
disease or condition to others. The court order shall specify the period of time the limitation is to be continued and shall provide for automatic termination of the order upon written determination by the State Health Director
or local health director that the quarantine or isolation is no longer necessary to protect the public health. In addition, where the petitioner can prove by a preponderance of the evidence that quarantine or isolation was not
or is no longer needed for protection of the public health, the person quarantined or isolated may move the trial court to reconsider its order extending quarantine or isolation before the time for the order otherwise expires and
may seek immediate or expedited termination of the order. Before the expiration of an order issued under this section, the State Health Director or local health director may move to continue the order for additional periods not
to exceed 30 days each. If the person whose freedom of movement has been limited has tuberculosis, the court shall continue the limitation for a period not to exceed one calendar year if it determines, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the limitation is reasonably necessary to prevent or limit the conveyance of tuberculosis to others. The court order shall specify the period of time the limitation is to be continued and shall provide for automatic
termination of the order upon written determination by the State Health Director or local health director that the quarantine or isolation is no longer necessary to protect the public health. In addition, where the petitioner can
prove by a preponderance of the evidence that quarantine or isolation was not or is no longer needed for protection of the public health, the person quarantined or isolated may move the trial court to reconsider its order extending
quarantine or isolation before the time for the order otherwise expires and may seek immediate or expedited termination of the order. Before the expiration of an order limiting the freedom of movement of a person with tuberculosis,
the State Health Director or local health director may move to continue the order for additional periods not to exceed one calendar year each.

Notwithstanding the first sentence of subsection (d) of this section, for a period of no more than seven calendar days, the State Health Director shall have the authority to determine and order that a class or category of persons need to be quarantined
or isolated to protect the public health. If such an order under this section applies statewide, the State Health Director may move the court for extensions of the order in accordance with subsection (e) of this section after the
State Health Director has notified the Governor, and the Governor has received the concurrence of the Council of State. If such an order applies less than statewide, the State Health Director may move the court for extension of
the order in accordance with subsection (e) of this section. If the State Health Director’s orders under this subsection would extend the application of the class or categories in areas, when combined, to statewide application,
the State Health Director shall notify the Governor, and the Governor shall seek the concurrence of the Council of State in accordance with this subsection prior to moving the court for the extension of any of the orders.

For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

Concurrence of the Council of State. — As defined in G.S. 166A-19.3(2d).

Statewide. — Two-thirds or more of the counties in this State.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 15; 2002-179, s. 5; 2004-80, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 19E.6(e).

Cross References.

As to entitlement to counsel of indigent person in a proceeding involving limitation of freedom of movement or access pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

, see G.S. 7A-451(a)(17).

As to detention of an individual arrested for violation of an order limiting freedom of movement or access issued pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

, see G.S. 15A-401(b)(4),

G.S. 15A-534.5

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.6(f), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E. 6(e), effective January 1, 2023, and applicable to the exercise of power under a state of emergency or declaration of emergency existing on or after
that date or any order of abatement issued on or after that date, and further provides: “Any power exercised under a state of emergency or declaration of emergency existing on that date that would require a concurrence of the Council
of State under

G.S. 166A-19.20

or

G.S. 166A-19.30

, as amended by this section, shall expire two days after this section becomes law unless a concurrence of the Council of State is sought and received in accordance with

G.S. 166A-19.20

or

G.S. 166A-19.30

, as amended by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-80, s. 2, effective July 8, 2004, in subsection (d), in the first paragraph, substituted “30” for “10” in the first sentence, added the third sentence and substituted “or terminate the limitation unless” for “the limitation if” in the
last sentence; and in the second paragraph, substituted “30-calendar-day” for “10-calendar-day” in the first sentence, added “or as a counterclaim in the pending case” at the end of the second sentence, inserted the exception at the
beginning of the third sentence, and added the fourth, fifth, and seventh through tenth sentences.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19E.6(e), substituted “authority in accordance with this section” for “authority” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); added designator (e); and added subsections (f) and (g). For effective date and applicability,
see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For a note that addresses the effect of United States Supreme Court decision on sodomy laws and the manner in which society may shape its characterization of Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS), and homosexuality, see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 226 (1987).

§ 130A-146.
Transportation of bodies of persons who have died of reportable diseases.

No person shall transport in this State the remains of any person who has died of a disease declared by the Commission to be reported until the body has been encased in a manner as prescribed by rule by the Commission. Only persons who have complied with
the rules of the Commission concerning the removal of dead bodies shall be issued a burial-transit permit.

History.
1893, c. 214, s. 16; Rev., s. 4459; C.S., s. 7161; 1953, c. 675, s. 16; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-147.
Rules of the Commission.

For the protection of the public health, the Commission is authorized to adopt rules for the detection, control and prevention of communicable diseases.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-148.
Laboratory tests for AIDS virus infection.

For the protection of the public health, the Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the certification of laboratories to perform tests for Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) virus infection. The rules shall address, but not be
limited to, proficiency testing, record maintenance, adequate staffing and confirmatory testing. Tests for AIDS virus infection shall be performed only by laboratories certified pursuant to this subsection and only on specimens
submitted by a physician licensed to practice medicine. This subsection shall not apply to testing performed solely for research purposes under the approval of an institutional review board.

Prior to obtaining consent for donation of blood, semen, tissue or organs, a facility or institution seeking to obtain blood, tissue, semen or organs for transfusion, implantation, transplantation or administration shall provide the potential donor with
information about AIDS virus transmission, and information about who should not donate.

No blood or semen may be transfused or administered when blood from the donor has not been tested or has tested positive for AIDS virus infection by a standard laboratory test.

No tissue or organs may be transplanted or implanted when blood from the donor has not been tested or has tested positive for AIDS virus infection by a standard laboratory test unless consent is obtained from the recipient, or from the recipient’s guardian
or a responsible adult relative of the recipient if the recipient is not competent to give such consent.

Any facility or institution that obtains or tranfuses, implants, transplants, or administers blood, tissue, semen, or organs shall be immune from civil or criminal liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed for transmission of AIDS virus infection
if the provisions specified in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section have been complied with.

Specimens may be tested for AIDS virus infection for research or epidemiologic purposes without consent of the person from whom the specimen is obtained if all personal identifying information is removed from the specimen prior to testing.

Persons tested for AIDS virus infection shall be notified of test results and counseled appropriately. This subsection shall not apply to tests performed by or for entities governed by Article 39 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, the Insurance Information
and Privacy Protection Act, provided that said entities comply with the notice requirements thereof.

The Commission may authorize or require laboratory tests for AIDS virus infection when necessary to protect the public health.A test for AIDS virus infection may also be performed upon any person solely by order of a physician licensed to practice medicine
in North Carolina who is rendering medical services to that person when, in the reasonable medical judgment of the physician, the test is necessary for the appropriate treatment of the person; however, the person shall be informed
that a test for AIDS virus infection is to be conducted, and shall be given clear opportunity to refuse to submit to the test prior to it being conducted, and further if informed consent is not obtained, the test may not be performed.
A physician may order a test for AIDS virus infection without the informed consent of the person tested if the person is incapable of providing or incompetent to provide such consent, others authorized to give consent for the person
are not available, and testing is necessary for appropriate diagnosis or care of the person.An unemancipated minor may be tested for AIDS virus infection without the consent of the parent or legal guardian of the minor when the
parent or guardian has refused to consent to such testing and there is reasonable suspicion that the minor has AIDS virus or HIV infection or that the child has been sexually abused.

Except as provided in this section, no test for AIDS virus infection shall be required, performed or used to determine suitability for continued employment, housing or public services, or for the use of places of public accommodation as defined in

G.S. 168A-3(8)

, or public transportation.Further it shall be unlawful to discriminate against any person having AIDS virus or HIV infection on account of that infection in determining suitability for continued employment, housing,
or public services, or for the use of places of public accommodation, as defined in

G.S. 168A-3(8)

, or public transportation.Any person aggrieved by an act or discriminatory practice prohibited by this subsection relating to housing shall be entitled to institute a civil action pursuant to

G.S. 41A-7

of the State Fair Housing Act. Any person aggrieved by an act or discriminatory practice prohibited by this subsection other than one relating to housing may bring a civil action to enforce rights granted or protected
by this subsection.The action shall be commenced in superior court in the county where the alleged discriminatory practice or prohibited conduct occurred or where the plaintiff or defendant resides. Such action shall be tried to
the court without a jury. Any relief granted by the court shall be limited to declaratory and injunctive relief, including orders to hire or reinstate an aggrieved person or admit such person to a labor organization.In a civil
action brought to enforce provisions of this subsection relating to employment, the court may award back pay. Any such back pay liability shall not accrue from a date more than two years prior to the filing of an action under this
subsection. Interim earnings or amounts earnable with reasonable diligence by the aggrieved person shall operate to reduce the back pay otherwise allowable. In any civil action brought under this subsection, the court, in its discretion,
may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the substantially prevailing party as a part of costs.A civil action brought pursuant to this subsection shall be commenced within 180 days after the date on which the aggrieved person became
aware or, with reasonable diligence, should have become aware of the alleged discriminatory practice or prohibited conduct.Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to prohibit an employer from:

Requiring a test for AIDS virus infection for job applicants in preemployment medical examinations required by the employer;

Denying employment to a job applicant based solely on a confirmed positive test for AIDS virus infection;

Including a test for AIDS virus infection performed in the course of an annual medical examination routinely required of all employees by the employer; or

Taking the appropriate employment action, including reassignment or termination of employment, if the continuation by the employee who has AIDS virus or HIV infection of his work tasks would pose a significant risk to the health of the employee, coworkers,
or the public, or if the employee is unable to perform the normally assigned duties of the job.

It shall not be unlawful for a licensed health care provider or facility to:

Treat a person who has AIDS virus or HIV infection differently from persons who do not have that infection when such treatment is appropriate to protect the health care provider or employees of the provider or employees of the facility while providing
appropriate care for the person who has the AIDS virus or HIV infection; or

Refer a person who has AIDS virus or HIV infection to another licensed health care provider or facility when such referral is for the purpose of providing more appropriate treatment for the person with AIDS virus or HIV infection.

History.
1987, c. 782, s. 16; 1989, c. 698, s. 1; 1991, c. 720, s. 78.

§ 130A-149.

Recodified as

G.S. 130A-479

by Session Laws 2002-179, s. 2, effective October 1, 2002.

Part 1A. Health Care-Associated Infections.